Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101.6b, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 6-101.6b. A. For purposes of this section, "teacher":
1. "Teacher" means the term as defined in paragraph 1 of
Section 1-116 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title; and
2. "Support employee" means the term as defined in paragraph 9
of Section 1-116 of this title.
B. No school district shall prohibit or take disciplinary
action against teachers or support employees for:
1. Disclosing public information to correct what the teacher or
support employee reasonably believes evidences a violation of the
Oklahoma Constitution or law or a rule promulgated pursuant to law;
2. Reporting a violation of the Oklahoma Constitution or state
or federal law; or

3. Taking any of the above actions without giving prior notice
to the teacher's or support employee's supervisor or anyone else in
the teacher's relevant chain of command.
C. For the purposes of this section, "reporting" means
providing a spoken or written account to a supervising teacher,
administrator, school board member, representative from the State
Department of Education, law enforcement official, district
attorney, and/or parent or legal guardian of a student directly
impacted by the actions.
D. Each school district shall prominently post or publish a
copy of this section of law in locations where it can reasonably be
expected to come to the attention of all teachers and support
employees.
E. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow a
teacher or support employee to violate students' or parents' rights
to confidentiality and protection under the Family Educational
Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (FERPA).
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1483 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1483 Page 3